Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-123
County court; civil matters; fees.

The county court shall be entitled to the following fees in civil matters:

(1) Twenty dollars for any and all services rendered up to and including the judgment or dismissal of the action other than for a domestic relations matter. Of such twenty-dollar fee, the following amounts shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges: (a) Six dollars through June 30, 2021, (b) beginning July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, eight dollars, (c) beginning July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023, nine dollars, (d) beginning July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024, ten dollars, (e) beginning July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, eleven dollars, and (f) beginning July 1, 2025, twelve dollars;

(2) For any and all services rendered up to and including the judgment or dismissal of a domestic relations matter, forty dollars;

(3) For filing a foreign judgment or a judgment transferred from another court in this state, fifteen dollars; and

(4) For writs of execution, writs of restitution, garnishment, and examination in aid of execution, five dollars each.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 8, p. 164;

Laws 1887, c. 41, § 1, p. 458;

Laws 1907, c. 56, § 1, p. 229;

Laws 1909, c. 58, § 1, p. 286;

R.S.1913, § 2449;

Laws 1915, c. 39, § 1, p. 110;

Laws 1917, c. 45, § 1, p. 125;

Laws 1921, c. 95, § 1, p. 357;

C.S.1922, § 2388;

Laws 1925, c. 98, § 1, p. 284;

C.S.1929, § 33-127;

Laws 1931, c. 64, § 1, p. 171;

Laws 1937, c. 86, § 1, p. 283;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-127;

R.S.1943, § 33-123;

Laws 1945, c. 74, § 1, p. 276;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 220;

Laws 1974, LB 739, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 99, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 29;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 233, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 270, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB468, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB17, § 6.